Tennessee, session 114, SB1628.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1351, is amended by deleting
subdivision (x)(5)(B) and substituting:
(B)
(i) Served for at least ten (10) years prior to retirement and was POST-
certified, or had equivalent training, on the date the officer retired; or
(ii) Served less than ten (10) years prior to retirement, was POST-
certified, or had equivalent training, on the date the officer retired, and retired
from service due to an injury received in the line of duty as a law enforcement
officer;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1628
010857
- 1 -